Yamls-norm/V-myteka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - myteka: # Verb pg 275 'eng run, pt' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     myteka+V+ScSg1: nymyteka # I run
     myteka+V+ScSg2: pymyteka # you(sg) run
     myteka+V+ScSg3M: ymyteka # he runs
     myteka+V+ScSg3F: umyteka # she runs


     myteka+V+ScPl1: amyteka # we run
     myteka+V+ScPl2: hỹmyteka # you(pl) run
     myteka+V+ScPl3M: ymytekana # they run
     myteka+V+ScPl3F: umytekana # they run
